Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3131.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-20-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette,
Other Tobacco Products, and Electronic Nicotine-Delivery System Products" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-20-1. Definitions.
Whenever used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Administrator” means the tax administrator.
(2) "Alternative nicotine product" means any noncombustible product that does not contain
tobacco leaf but does contain nicotine from any source and is intended for human consumption,
whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, ingested, inhaled, or consumed by any other means.
"Alternative nicotine products" does not include any cigarettes, electronic nicotine-delivery system
products, snuff, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug
Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. ch. 9 § 301 et seq.
(2)(3) “Cigarettes” means and includes any cigarettes suitable for smoking in cigarette
form, “heat not burn products,” and each sheet of cigarette rolling paper, including but not limited
to, paper made into a hollow cylinder or cone, made with paper or any other material, with or
without a filter suitable for use in making cigarettes.
(3)(4) “Dealer” means any person whether located within or outside of this state, who sells
or distributes cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system

products to a consumer in this state.
(4)(5) “Distributor” means any person:
(i) Whether located within or outside of this state, other than a dealer, who sells or
distributes cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products within or into this state. Such term shall not include any cigarette or other tobacco product
manufacturer, export warehouse proprietor, or importer with a valid permit under 26 U.S.C. § 5712,
if such person sells or distributes cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic
nicotine-delivery system products in this state only to licensed distributors, or to an export
warehouse proprietor or another manufacturer with a valid permit under 26 U.S.C. § 5712;
(ii) Selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery
system products directly to purchasers in this state by means of at least twenty-five (25) vending
machines;
(iii) Engaged in this state in the business of manufacturing cigarettes and/or other tobacco
products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products or any person engaged in the business
of selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products to dealers, or to other persons, for the purpose of resale only; provided, that seventy-five
percent (75%) of all cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery
system products sold by that person in this state are sold to dealers or other persons for resale and
selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products
directly to at least forty (40) dealers or other persons for resale; or
(iv) Maintaining one or more regular places of business in this state for that purpose;
provided, that seventy-five percent (75%) of the sold cigarettes and/or other tobacco products
and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products are purchased directly from the manufacturer
and selling cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products directly to at least forty (40) dealers or other persons for resale.
(5)(6) “Electronic nicotine-delivery system” means an electronic device that may be used
to simulate smoking in the delivery of nicotine or other substance to a person inhaling from the
device, and includes, but is not limited to, an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic
cigarillo, electronic little cigars, electronic pipe, electronic hookah, e-liquids, e-liquid products, or
any related device and any cartridge or other component of such device.
(6)(7) “Electronic nicotine-delivery system products” means any combination of electronic
nicotine-delivery system and/or e-liquid and/or any derivative thereof, and/or any e-liquid
container. Electronic nicotine-delivery system products shall include hemp-derived consumable
CBD products as defined in § 2-26-3.
LC006176 - Page 2 of 8

(7)(8) “E-liquid” and “e-liquid products” mean any liquid or substance placed in or sold
for use in an electronic nicotine-delivery system that generally utilizes a heating element that
aerosolizes, vaporizes, or combusts a liquid or other substance containing nicotine or nicotine
derivative:
(i) Whether the liquid or substance contains nicotine or a nicotine derivative; or
(ii) Whether sold separately or sold in combination with a personal vaporizer, electronic
nicotine-delivery system, or an electronic inhaler.
(8)(9) “Importer” means any person who imports into the United States, either directly or
indirectly, a finished cigarette or other tobacco product and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
product for sale or distribution.
(9)(10) “Licensed,” when used with reference to a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or
dealer, means only those persons who hold a valid and current license issued under § 44-20-2 for
the type of business being engaged in. When the term “licensed” is used before a list of entities,
such as “licensed manufacturer, importer, wholesale dealer, or retailer dealer,” such term shall be
deemed to apply to each entity in such list.
(10)(11) “Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures, fabricates, assembles,
processes, or labels a finished cigarette and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-
delivery system products.
(11)(12) “Other tobacco products” (OTP) means any products that are made from or
derived from tobacco or that contain nicotine, whether natural or artificial, including, but not
limited to, cigars (excluding Little Cigars, as defined in § 44-20.2-1, which are subject to cigarette
tax), cheroots, stogies, smoking tobacco (including granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed
and any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for smoking in a pipe or otherwise), chewing
tobacco (including Cavendish, twist, plug, scrap and any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable
for chewing), any and all forms of hookah, shisha and “mu’assel” tobacco, snuff, alternative
nicotine products and shall include any other articles or products made of, derived from, or
containing tobacco or nicotine, in whole or in part, or any tobacco or nicotine substitute, except
cigarettes and electronic nicotine-delivery system products. Other tobacco products shall not mean
any product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the sale
of or use as a tobacco or nicotine cessation product or for other medical purposes and is marketed
and sold or prescribed exclusively for that approved purpose.
(12)(13) “Person” means any individual, including an employee or agent, firm, fiduciary,
partnership, corporation, trust, or association, however formed.
(13)(14) “Pipe” means an apparatus made of any material used to burn or vaporize products
LC006176 - Page 3 of 8

so that the smoke or vapors can be inhaled or ingested by the user.
(14)(15) “Place of business” means any location where cigarettes and/or other tobacco
products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products are sold, stored, or kept, including,
but not limited to; any storage room, attic, basement, garage or other facility immediately adjacent
to the location. It also includes any receptacle, hide, vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or vending
machine.
(15)(16) “Sale” or “sell” means gifts, exchanges, and barter of cigarettes and/or other
tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products. The act of holding, storing,
or keeping cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products at a place of business for any purpose shall be presumed to be holding the cigarettes and/or
other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products for sale. Furthermore,
any sale of cigarettes and/or other tobacco products and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system
products by the servants, employees, or agents of the licensed dealer during business hours at the
place of business shall be presumed to be a sale by the licensee.
(16)(17) “Stamp” means the impression, device, stamp, label, or print manufactured,
printed, or made as prescribed by the administrator to be affixed to packages of cigarettes, as
evidence of the payment of the tax provided by this chapter or to indicate that the cigarettes are
intended for a sale or distribution in this state that is exempt from state tax under the provisions of
state law; and also includes impressions made by metering machines authorized to be used under
the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Section 44-20-13.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette,
Other Tobacco Products, and Electronic Nicotine-Delivery System Products" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-20-13.2. Tax imposed on other tobacco products, smokeless tobacco, cigars, pipe
tobacco products, and electronic nicotine-delivery products Tax imposed on other tobacco
products and electronic nicotine-delivery products.
(a) A tax is imposed on all other tobacco products, smokeless tobacco, cigars, pipe tobacco
products, and electronic nicotine-delivery system products sold, or held for sale in the state by any
person, the payment of the tax to be accomplished according to a mechanism established by the
administrator, division of taxation, department of revenue. The tax imposed by this section shall be
as follows:
(1) For all other tobacco products, except for alternative nicotine products and snuff
smokeless tobacco, cigars, and pipe tobacco products, at the rate of eighty percent (80%) of the
wholesale cost of other tobacco products, cigars, pipe tobacco products, and smokeless tobacco
LC006176 - Page 4 of 8

other than snuff.
(2) Notwithstanding the eighty percent (80%) rate in subsection (a)(1) of this section, in
the case of cigars, the tax shall not exceed fifty cents ($.50) for each cigar.
(3) At the rate of one dollar ($1.00) per ounce of snuff, and a proportionate tax at the like
rate on all fractional parts of an ounce thereof. Such tax shall be computed based on the net weight
as listed by the manufacturer; provided, however, that any product listed by the manufacturer as
having a net weight of less than 1.2 ounces shall be taxed as if the product has a net weight of 1.2
ounces.
(4) Effective January 1, 2025:
(i) For electronic nicotine-delivery system products that are prefilled, sealed by the
manufacturer, and not refillable, at the rate of fifty cents per milliliter ($0.50/mL) of the e-liquid
and/or e-liquid products contained therein; and
(ii) For any other electronic nicotine-delivery system products, at the rate of ten percent
(10%) of the wholesale cost of such products, whether or not sold at wholesale, and if not sold,
then at the same rate upon the use by the wholesaler.
(iii) Existing Inventory Floor Tax. For all electronic nicotine-delivery system products
held by licensed electronic nicotine-delivery system products retailers as of January 1, 2025: Each
person engaging in the business of selling electronic nicotine-delivery system products at retail in
this state shall pay a tax measured by the volume of e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained in
electronic nicotine-delivery system products that are prefilled, sealed by the manufacturer, and not
refillable and the wholesale cost of all other electronic nicotine-delivery system products held by
the person in this state at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2025, and is computed for electronic nicotine-
delivery system products that are prefilled, sealed by the manufacturer, and not refillable, at the
rate of fifty cents per milliliter ($0.50/mL) of the e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained therein
and for any other electronic nicotine-delivery system products at the rate of ten percent (10%) of
the wholesale cost of such products on January 1, 2025. Each person subject to the payment of the
tax imposed by this section shall, on or before January 16, 2025, file a return, under oath or certified
under the penalties of perjury, with the administrator on forms furnished by the administrator,
showing the volume of e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained in electronic nicotine-delivery
system products which are prefilled, sealed by the manufacturer, and not refillable and the
wholesale cost of all other electronic nicotine-delivery system products in that person’s possession
in this state at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2025, as described in this section, and the amount of tax
due, and shall at the time of filing the return pay the tax to the administrator. Failure to obtain forms
shall not be an excuse for the failure to make a return containing the information required by the
LC006176 - Page 5 of 8

administrator.
(iv) For all electronic nicotine-delivery system products sold by licensed electronic
nicotine-delivery system products distributors, manufacturers, and/or importers in Rhode Island as
of January 1, 2025: Any person engaging in the business of distributing at wholesale electronic
nicotine-delivery system products in this state shall pay a tax measured by the volume of e-liquid
and/or e-liquid products contained in electronic nicotine-delivery system products that are prefilled,
sealed by the manufacturer, and not refillable computed at the rate of fifty cents per milliliter
($0.50/mL) of the e-liquid and/or e-liquid products contained therein and for all other electronic
nicotine-delivery system products at the rate of ten percent (10%) of the wholesale cost of such
products.
(5) For alternative nicotine products, at the rate of two dollars ($2.00) per container
containing up to twenty (20) units, and a proportionate tax at the like rate on containers that have
more than twenty (20) units.
(b)(1) Prior to January 1, 2025, any dealer having in the dealer’s possession any other
tobacco products with respect to the storage or use of which a tax is imposed by this section shall,
within five (5) days after coming into possession of the other tobacco products in this state, file a
return with the tax administrator in a form prescribed by the tax administrator. The return shall be
accompanied by a payment of the amount of the tax shown on the form to be due. Records required
under this section shall be preserved on the premises described in the relevant license in such a
manner as to ensure permanency and accessibility for inspection at reasonable hours by authorized
personnel of the administrator.
(2) Effective January 1, 2025, all other tobacco products, except for cigars, and electronic
nicotine-delivery system products sold at wholesale in Rhode Island must be sold by a Rhode Island
licensed distributor, manufacturer, or importer, and purchases of other tobacco products, except for
cigars, and/or electronic nicotine-delivery system products, from an unlicensed distributor,
manufacturer, or importer are prohibited. Any other tobacco products, except for cigars, and/or
electronic nicotine-delivery system products purchased and/or obtained from an unlicensed person
shall be subject to the terms of this chapter including, but not limited to, § 44-20-15 and shall be
taxed pursuant to this section.
(3) Effective January 1, 2025, any dealer having in the dealer’s possession any cigars with
respect to the storage or use of which a tax is imposed by this section shall, within five (5) days
after coming into possession of cigars in this state, file a return with the tax administrator in a form
prescribed by the tax administrator. The return shall be accompanied by a payment of the amount
of the tax shown on the form to be due. Records required under this section shall be preserved on
LC006176 - Page 6 of 8

the premises described in the relevant license in such a manner as to ensure permanency and
accessibility for inspection at reasonable hours by authorized personnel of the administrator.
(c) Existing Inventory Floor Tax.
(1) For all nicotine products defined in § 44-20-1 as other tobacco products but not
previously taxed as other tobacco products held by licensed retailers as of October 1, 2025: Each
person engaging in the business of selling nicotine products at retail in this state shall pay a tax at
the rate of eighty percent (80%) of the wholesale cost of such products on October 1, 2025. Each
person subject to the payment of the tax imposed by this section shall, on or before October 16,
2025, file a return, under oath or certified under the penalties of perjury, with the administrator on
forms furnished by the administrator, showing the wholesale cost of all nicotine products not
previously taxed as other tobacco products in that person’s possession in this state at 12:01 a.m. on
October 1, 2025, as described in this section, and the amount of tax due, and shall at the time of
filing the return pay the tax to the administrator. Failure to obtain forms shall not be an excuse for
the failure to make a return containing the information required by the administrator.
(2) For all nicotine products defined in § 44-20-1 as other tobacco products but not
previously taxed as other tobacco products held by licensed distributors, manufacturers, and/or
importers in Rhode Island as of October 1, 2025: Each person engaging in the business of
distributing at wholesale nicotine products defined in § 44-20-1 as other tobacco products but not
previously taxed as other tobacco products in this state shall pay a tax at the rate of eighty percent
(80%) of the wholesale cost of such products on October 1, 2025. Each person subject to the
payment of the tax imposed by this section shall, on or before October 16, 2025, file a return, under
oath or certified under the penalties of perjury, with the administrator on forms furnished by the
administrator, showing the wholesale cost of all nicotine products not previously taxed as other
tobacco products in that person’s possession in this state at 12:01 a.m. on October 1, 2025, as
described in this section, and the amount of tax due, and shall at the time of filing the return pay
the tax to the administrator. Failure to obtain forms shall not be an excuse for the failure to make a
return containing the information required by the administrator.
(d) The proceeds collected are paid into the general fund.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC006176
========
LC006176 - Page 7 of 8